test/src/morphology/N-volg_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - vȯļg*: # Noun 111 'eng /est õlg ­e/fin' - full paradigm
     vȯļg*+N+Sg+Nom: vȯļg*
     vȯļg*+N+Sg+Gen: vȯlg
     vȯļg*+N+Sg+Par: vȱlgta
     vȯļg*+N+Sg+Dat: vȯlgõn
     vȯļg*+N+Sg+Ins: vȯlgkõks
     vȯļg*+N+Sg+Ill: vȯlgõ
     vȯļg*+N+Sg+Ela: vȯlgstõ
     vȯļg*+N+Pl+Nom: vȱlgõd
     vȯļg*+N+Pl+Gen: vȱlgõd
     vȯļg*+N+Pl+Par: vȯļgi
     vȯļg*+N+Pl+Dat: vȱlgõdõn
     vȯļg*+N+Pl+Ins: vȱlgõdõks
     vȯļg*+N+Pl+Ill: vȱlgiž
     vȯļg*+N+Pl+Ela: vȯļgšti
